District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2502.34

Temporary transfer of licenses

Repealed.

History

April 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-227, § 16(c), 44 DCR 140

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 35-1536 to 35-1541.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(r)(2) ( 44 DCR 1730), eff. May 21, 1997, amends former §§ 35-1536, 35-1538, 35-1539, and 35-1540 1981 Ed. subsequent to repeal.